Utah statutes.
76-6-1405.   Qualifications to sell to dealer.

(1)  A dealer may not purchase regulated metal from a person younger than 18 years of age.

(2)  If the person is unable to comply with all the identification requirements of Subsection 76-6-1403(2), the dealer may not conduct a transaction of regulated metal with that person.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

